Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 5. Pesticide Control.

Administrative Code. —

For pesticide control, see 18 AAC 90.

Collateral references. —

61C Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, § 1633 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 156 et seq.

Constitutionality of statutes for protection of vegetation against disease or infection. 70 ALR2d 852.

Liability for injury caused by spraying or dusting of crops. 37 ALR3d 833.

Sec. 46.03.320.
Regulation of pesticides and broadcast chemicals.

The department may

regulate the transportation, testing, inspection, packaging, labeling, handling, and advertising of pesticides and broadcast chemicals offered for sale or placed in commerce for use in the state;

regulate and supervise the distribution, application, or use of pesticides and broadcast chemicals in any state project or program or by a public agency under the jurisdiction of the state;

regulate or prohibit the use of pesticides and broadcast chemicals;

register pesticides and broadcast chemicals for sale or distribution.

The department may provide by regulation for the licensing of or temporary license waiver for private applicators of restricted-use pesticides, for persons engaged in the custom, commercial, or contract spraying or application of pesticides and broadcast chemicals, and for other persons engaged in the spraying or application of pesticides and broadcast chemicals in public places. A person engaged in the custom, commercial, or contract spraying or application of pesticides and broadcast chemicals may, by regulation, be required to secure a surety bond or liability insurance.

A person may not apply a pesticide or broadcast chemical in a public place unless licensed by the department or otherwise authorized under a regulation of the department. The department shall by regulation provide for reasonable public notification, including written notice posted on the application site, when pesticides and broadcast chemicals are applied in a public place. In this subsection, “public place” means (1) common areas of an apartment building or other multi-family dwelling; (2) that portion of a government office or facility to which access is not ordinarily restricted to employees; and (3) plazas, parks, and public sports fields.

In this section, “multi-family dwelling” means a building that includes more than four single-family dwellings.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1977; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 42 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For purpose, applicability, prohibitions, and discharge notification, see 18 AAC 90, art. 1.

For pesticide registration, see 18 AAC 90, art. 2.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 3.

For recordkeeping requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 4.

For permit requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 5.

For pesticide handling requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 6.

For inspection and enforcement, see 18 AAC 90, art. 7.

For forestry vegetation management, see 18 AAC 90, art. 8.

Sec. 46.03.330.
Public pesticide programs.

An officer, agent, or employee of the state, or of a borough or city of any class, may not direct, carry out, or participate in the spraying or application of a pesticide or broadcast chemical in any program or project involving funds, materials, or equipment of the state, borough, or city, except in accordance with regulations adopted by the department under AS

46.03.320

.

Before a public project that would affect land owned separately by two or more persons is initiated, the person directing the program shall give public notice of the program in the manner required by regulations of the department. The department shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed program if a hearing is requested by the governing body of the affected borough or city, or by a petition signed by at least 50 residents. The requirement for public notice or public hearing may be waived if the commissioner determines that a public emergency exists.

The provisions of this section apply to home rule municipalities.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For purpose, applicability, prohibitions, and discharge notification, see 18 AAC 90, art. 1.

For pesticide registration, see 18 AAC 90, art. 2.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 3.

For recordkeeping requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 4.

For permit requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 5.

For pesticide handling requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 6.

For inspection and enforcement, see 18 AAC 90, art. 7.

For forestry vegetation management, see 18 AAC 90, art. 8.